Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2826.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT NO. 186, PEQUOT LAKES; SALES TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling relating to the following projects in Independent School District No. 186, Pequot Lakes, are exempt from sales and use tax under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, provided that the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after December 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2037: new text end new text begin (1) an addition and improvements to Eagle View Elementary School; new text end new text begin (2) an addition and improvements to Pequot Lakes Middle School; new text end new text begin (3) an addition and improvements to Pequot Lakes High School; and new text end new text begin (4) improvements to outdoor facilities. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, except that the applicant must be the governmental entity that owns or contracts for the project. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for sales and purchases made after December 31, 2025, and before January 1, 2037. new text end